Massachusetts, session 194th, S1736.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 146 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by striking out section 53A, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 53A. There shall be in the department a board to be known as the board of
hoisting machinery regulations, which shall consist of six members to be appointed by the
governor, with the advice and consent of the council, for terms of four years each. One such
member shall be the chief inspector in said department, who shall serve as chair and act as a
nonvoting member of said board, except in the case of a tie vote, one shall be an employee of a
public utility who is actively engaged in hoisting machinery operations in the Commonwealth,
one shall be a member from a private construction contractor who is actively engaged in hoisting
of 3

machinery operations in the Commonwealth, one shall be a safety trainer who is authorized by
the department to do continuing education classes for hoisting licenses in Massachusetts, one
shall be an expert in the Occupational Safety and Health Administration who is actively involved
in hoisting machinery related operations, and one shall be from the International Union of
Operating engineers Local with jurisdictions in Massachusetts who has been actively engaged in
hoisting machinery related operations in the commonwealth for not less than five years
immediately preceding appointment.
Said board shall promulgate rules and regulations, pursuant to chapter 30A, embodying
the classifications of hoisting machinery and establishing criteria and procedures for the
issuance, denial, renewal, suspension and revocation of licenses of apprentice operators of such
machinery. However, a final adjudication that there has been a violation of federal or state
occupational safety and health regulations, or any rule or regulation adopted by the department,
shall be cause for the denial, revocation or suspension of any license issued under this section.
Criteria for issuance of such licenses shall include, but not be limited to, training and experience
requirements appropriate to the categories of machinery for which the license is intended, and
registration with the apprenticeship council within the department of labor standards. A holder of
such apprentice license may operate hoisting machinery only under the guidance and supervision
of a holder of a license to operate for the category of hoisting machinery to be operated by the
apprentice
A majority of said board, constituted as above provided, may transact business, but a
lesser number may adjourn from time to time.
of 3

The board may, subject to appropriation and with the approval of the commissioner,
employ an executive secretary who shall not be subject to the provisions of chapter thirty-one
and may employ such clerical, technical and other assistants as may be required by said board.
of 3